Mississippi, session 2026, HB1330.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 67-1-5, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 67-1-5.  For the purposes of this article and unless otherwise required by the context: (a)  "Alcoholic beverage" means any alcoholic liquid, including wines of more than five percent (5%) of alcohol by weight, capable of being consumed as a beverage by a human being, but shall not include light wine, light spirit product and beer, as defined in Section 67-3-3, but shall include native wines, native spirits, and craft spirits.  The words "alcoholic beverage" shall not include ethyl alcohol manufactured or distilled solely for fuel purposes or beer of an alcoholic content of more than eight percent (8%) by weight if the beer is legally manufactured in this state for sale in another state. (b) "Alcohol" means the product of distillation of any fermented liquid, whatever the origin thereof, and includes synthetic ethyl alcohol, but does not include denatured alcohol or wood alcohol. (c)  "Distilled spirits" means any beverage containing more than six percent (6%) of alcohol by weight produced by distillation of fermented grain, starch, molasses or sugar, including dilutions and mixtures of these beverages. (d)  "Wine" or "vinous liquor" means any product obtained from the alcoholic fermentation of the juice of sound, ripe grapes, fruits, honey or berries and made in accordance with the revenue laws of the United States. (e)  "Person" means and includes any individual, partnership, corporation, association or other legal entity whatsoever. (f) "Manufacturer" means any person engaged in manufacturing, distilling, rectifying, blending or bottling any alcoholic beverage. (g) "Wholesaler" means any person, other than a manufacturer, engaged in distributing or selling any alcoholic beverage at wholesale for delivery within or without this state when such sale is for the purpose of resale by the purchaser. (h) "Retailer" means any person who sells, distributes, or offers for sale or distribution, any alcoholic beverage for use or consumption by the purchaser and not for resale. (i)  "State Tax Commission," "commission" or "department" means the Department of Revenue of the State of Mississippi, which shall create a division in its organization to be known as the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division.  Any reference to the commission or the department hereafter means the powers and duties of the Department of Revenue with reference to supervision of the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division. (j) "Division" means the Alcoholic Beverage Control Division of the Department of Revenue. (k) "Municipality" means any incorporated city or town of this state. (l)  "Hotel" means an establishment within a municipality, or within a qualified resort area approved as such by the department, where, in consideration of payment, food and lodging are habitually furnished to travelers and wherein are located at least twenty (20) adequately furnished and completely separate sleeping rooms with adequate facilities that persons usually apply for and receive as overnight accommodations.  Hotels in towns or cities of more than twenty-five thousand (25,000) population are similarly defined except that they must have fifty (50) or more sleeping rooms.  Any such establishment described in this paragraph with less than fifty (50) beds shall operate one or more regular dining rooms designed to be constantly frequented by customers each day.  When used in this article, the word "hotel" shall also be construed to include any establishment that meets the definition of "bed and breakfast inn" as provided in this section. (m) "Restaurant" means: (i)  A place which is regularly and in a bona fide manner used and kept open for the serving of meals to guests for compensation, which has suitable seating facilities for guests, and which has suitable kitchen facilities connected therewith for cooking an assortment of foods and meals commonly ordered at various hours of the day; the service of such food as sandwiches and salads only shall not be deemed in compliance with this requirement.  Except as otherwise provided in this paragraph, no place shall qualify as a restaurant under this article unless twenty-five percent (25%) or more of the revenue derived from such place shall be from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages, or unless the value of food given to and consumed by customers is equal to twenty-five percent (25%) or more of total revenue; or (ii)  Any privately owned business located in a building in a historic district where the district is listed in the National Register of Historic Places, where the building has a total occupancy rating of not less than one thousand (1,000) and where the business regularly utilizes ten thousand (10,000) square feet or more in the building for live entertainment, including not only the stage, lobby or area where the audience sits and/or stands, but also any other portion of the building necessary for the operation of the business, including any kitchen area, bar area, storage area and office space, but excluding any area for parking.  In addition to the other requirements of this subparagraph, the business must also serve food to guests for compensation within the building and derive the majority of its revenue from event-related fees, including, but not limited to, admission fees or ticket sales to live entertainment in the building, and from the rental of all or part of the facilities of the business in the building to another party for a specific event or function. (n)  "Club" means an association or a corporation: (i)  Organized or created under the laws of this state for a period of five (5) years prior to July 1, 1966; (ii)  Organized not primarily for pecuniary profit but for the promotion of some common object other than the sale or consumption of alcoholic beverages; (iii)  Maintained by its members through the payment of annual dues; (iv)  Owning, hiring or leasing a building or space in a building of such extent and character as may be suitable and adequate for the reasonable and comfortable use and accommodation of its members and their guests; (v)  The affairs and management of which are conducted by a board of directors, board of governors, executive committee, or similar governing body chosen by the members at a regular meeting held at some periodic interval; and (vi)  No member, officer, agent or employee of which is paid, or directly or indirectly receives, in the form of a salary or other compensation any profit from the distribution or sale of alcoholic beverages to the club or to members or guests of the club beyond such salary or compensation as may be fixed and voted at a proper meeting by the board of directors or other governing body out of the general revenues of the club. The department may, in its discretion, waive the five-year provision of this paragraph.  In order to qualify under this paragraph, a club must file with the department, at the time of its application for a license under this article, two (2) copies of a list of the names and residences of its members and similarly file, within ten (10) days after the election of any additional member, his name and address.  Each club applying for a license shall also file with the department at the time of the application a copy of its articles of association, charter of incorporation, bylaws or other instruments governing the business and affairs thereof. (o)  "Qualified resort area" means any area or locality outside of the limits of incorporated municipalities in this state commonly known and accepted as a place which regularly and customarily attracts tourists, vacationists and other transients because of its historical, scenic or recreational facilities or attractions, or because of other attributes which regularly and customarily appeal to and attract tourists, vacationists and other transients in substantial numbers; however, no area or locality shall so qualify as a resort area until it has been duly and properly approved as such by the department. The department may not approve an area as a qualified resort area after July 1, 2018, if any portion of such proposed area is located within two (2) miles of a convent or monastery that is located in a county traversed by Interstate 55 and U.S. Highway 98.  A convent or monastery may waive such distance restrictions in favor of allowing approval by the department of an area as a qualified resort area.  Such waiver shall be in written form from the owner, the governing body, or the appropriate officer of the convent or monastery having the authority to execute such a waiver, and the waiver shall be filed with and verified by the department before becoming effective. (i)  The department may approve an area or locality outside of the limits of an incorporated municipality that is in the process of being developed as a qualified resort area if such area or locality, when developed, can reasonably be expected to meet the requisites of the definition of the term "qualified resort area."  In such a case, the status of qualified resort area shall not take effect until completion of the development. (ii)  The term includes any state park which is declared a resort area by the department; however, such declaration may only be initiated in a written request for resort area status made to the department by the Executive Director of the Department of Wildlife, Fisheries and Parks, and no permit for the sale of any alcoholic beverage, as defined in this article, except an on-premises retailer's permit, shall be issued for a hotel, restaurant or bed and breakfast inn in such park. (iii)  The term includes: 1.  The clubhouses associated with the state park golf courses at the Lefleur's Bluff State Park, the John Kyle State Park, the Percy Quin State Park and the Hugh White State Park; 2.  The clubhouse and associated golf course, tennis courts and related facilities and swimming pool and related facilities where the golf course, tennis courts and related facilities and swimming pool and related facilities are adjacent to one or more planned residential developments and the golf course and all such developments collectively include at least seven hundred fifty (750) acres and at least four hundred (400) residential units; 3.  Any facility located on property that is a game reserve with restricted access that consists of at least three thousand (3,000) contiguous acres with no public roads and that offers as a service hunts for a fee to overnight guests of the facility; 4.  Any facility located on federal property surrounding a lake and designated as a recreational area by the United States Army Corps of Engineers that consists of at least one thousand five hundred (1,500) acres; 5.  Any facility that is located in a municipality that is bordered by the Pearl River, traversed by Mississippi Highway 25, adjacent to the boundaries of the Jackson International Airport and is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law; however, any such facility may only be located in areas designated by the governing authorities of such municipality; 6.  Any municipality with a population in excess of ten thousand (10,000) according to the latest federal decennial census that is located in a county that is bordered by the Pearl River and is not traversed by Interstate Highway 20, with a population in excess of forty-five thousand (45,000) according to the latest federal decennial census; 7.  The West Pearl Restaurant Tax District as defined in Chapter 912, Local and Private Laws of 2007; 8.  a.  Land that is located in any county in which Mississippi Highway 43 and Mississippi Highway 25 intersect and: A. Owned by the Pearl River Valley Water Supply District, and/or B. Located within the Reservoir Community District, zoned commercial, east of Old Fannin Road, north of Regatta Drive, south of Spillway Road, west of Hugh Ward Boulevard and accessible by Old Fannin Road, Spillway Road, Spann Drive and/or Lake Vista Place, and/or C. Located within the Reservoir Community District, zoned commercial, west of Old Fannin Road, south of Spillway Road and extending to the boundary of the corporate limits of the City of Flowood, Mississippi; b.  The board of supervisors of such county, with respect to B and C of item 8.a., may by resolution or other order: A. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale, B. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages, and C. Designate the areas in which facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale may be located; 9.  Any facility located on property that is a game reserve with restricted access that consists of at least eight hundred (800) contiguous acres with no public roads, that offers as a service hunts for a fee to overnight guests of the facility, and has accommodations for at least fifty (50) overnight guests; 10.  Any facility that: a. Consists of at least six thousand (6,000) square feet being heated and cooled along with an additional adjacent area that consists of at least two thousand two hundred (2,200) square feet regardless of whether heated and cooled, b.  For a fee is used to host events such as weddings, reunions and conventions, c. Provides lodging accommodations regardless of whether part of the facility and/or located adjacent to or in close proximity to the facility, and d.  Is located on property that consists of at least thirty (30) contiguous acres; 11.  Any facility and related property: a. Located on property that consists of at least one hundred twenty-five (125) contiguous acres and consisting of an eighteen-hole golf course, and/or located in a facility that consists of at least eight thousand (8,000) square feet being heated and cooled, b.  Used for the purpose of providing meals and hosting events, and c.  Used for the purpose of teaching culinary arts courses and/or turf management and grounds keeping courses, and/or outdoor recreation and leadership courses; 12.  Any facility and related property that: a. Consist of at least eight thousand (8,000) square feet being heated and cooled, b.  For a fee is used to host events, c.  Is used for the purpose of culinary arts courses, and/or live entertainment courses and art performances, and/or outdoor recreation and leadership courses; 13.  The clubhouse and associated golf course where the golf course is adjacent to one or more residential developments and the golf course and all such developments collectively include at least two hundred (200) acres and at least one hundred fifty (150) residential units and are located a. in a county that has voted against coming out from under the dry law; and b. outside of but in close proximity to a municipality in such county which has voted under Section 67-1-14, after January 1, 2013, to come out from under the dry law; 14.  The clubhouse and associated eighteen-hole golf course located in a municipality traversed by Interstate Highway 55 and U.S. Highway 51 that has voted to come out from under the dry law; 15.  a.  Land that is planned for mixed-use development and consists of at least two hundred (200) contiguous acres with one or more planned residential developments collectively planned to include at least two hundred (200) residential units when completed, and also including a facility that consists of at least four thousand (4,000) square feet that is not part of such land but is located adjacent to or in close proximity thereto, and in addition, also including land located and beginning outside of and adjacent to the south boundary of the corporate limits of a municipality on South Montgomery Street and running approximately one (1) mile west outside of and along such corporate limits, then running in a straight line parallel to South Montgomery Street south to Poor House Road, then running east along Poor House Road to South Montgomery Street, and then running north along South Montgomery Street back to the point of beginning, and which land is located: A. In a county that has voted to come out from under the dry law, B. Outside the corporate limits of any municipality in such county and adjacent to or in close proximity to a golf course located in a municipality in such county, and C. Within one (1) mile of a state institution of higher learning; b.  The board of supervisors of such county may by resolution or other order: A. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale, B. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages, and C. Designate the areas in which facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale may be located; 16.  Any facility with a capacity of five hundred (500) people or more, to be used as a venue for private events, on a tract of land in the Southwest Quarter of Section 33, Township 2 South, Range 7 East, of a county where U.S. Highway 45 and U.S. Highway 72 intersect and that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 17.  One hundred five (105) contiguous acres, more or less, located in Hinds County, Mississippi, and in the City of Jackson, Mississippi, whereon are constructed a variety of buildings, improvements, grounds or objects for the purpose of holding events thereon to promote agricultural and industrial development in Mississippi; 18.  Land that is owned by a state institution of higher learning, land that is owned by an entity that is bound by an affiliation agreement with a state institution of higher learning, or land that is owned by one or more other entities so long as such other entities are solely owned, either directly or through additional entities, by an institution of higher learning and/or one or more entities bound by affiliation agreements with such institution, and: a.  Located entirely within a county that has elected by majority vote not to permit the transportation, storage, sale, distribution, receipt and/or manufacture of light wine and beer pursuant to Section 67-3-7; and b.  A. Located adjacent to but outside the incorporated limits of a municipality that has elected by majority vote to permit the sale, receipt, storage and transportation of light wine and beer pursuant to Section 67-3-9; or B. Located in an area bounded on the north by College View Drive, on the east by Mississippi Highway 12 East, on the south by Mississippi Highway 12 East, on the west by Mill Street, on the north by Russell Street, then on the west by Colonel Muldrow Avenue, on the north by University Drive, on the west by Adkerson Way within a municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 25, Mississippi Highway 12 and U.S. Highway 82. If any portion of the land described in this item 18 has been declared a qualified resort area by the department before July 1, 2020, then that qualified resort area shall be incorporated into the qualified resort area created by this item 18; 19.  Any facility and related property: a.  Used as a flea market or similar venue during a weekend (Saturday and Sunday) immediately preceding the first Monday of a month and having an annual average of at least one thousand (1,000) visitors for each such weekend and five hundred (500) vendors for Saturday of each such weekend, and b. Located in a county that has not voted to come out from under the dry law and outside of but in close proximity to a municipality located in such county and which municipality has voted to come out from under the dry law; 20.  Blocks 1, 2 and 3 of the original town square in any municipality with a population in excess of one thousand five hundred (1,500) according to the latest federal decennial census and which is located in: a.  A county traversed by Interstate 55 and Interstate 20, and b.  A judicial district that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 21.  Any municipality with a population in excess of two thousand (2,000) according to the latest federal decennial census and in which is located a part of White's Creek Lake and in which U.S. Highway 82 intersects with Mississippi Highway 9 and located in a county that is partially bordered on one (1) side by the Big Black River; 22.  A restaurant located on a two-acre tract adjacent to a five-hundred-fifty-acre lake in the northeast corner of a county traversed by U.S. Interstate 55 and U.S. Highway 84; 23.  Any tracts of land in Oktibbeha County, situated north of Bailey Howell Drive, Lee Boulevard and Old Mayhew Road, east of George Perry Street and south of Mississippi Highway 182, and not located on the property of a state institution of higher learning; however, the board of supervisors of such county may by resolution or other order: a. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale; b. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages; and c. Designate the areas in which facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale may be located; 24.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 27 and Mississippi Highway 28 intersect; 25.  A municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 35 and Interstate 20; 26.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 16 and Mississippi Highway 35 intersect; 27.  A municipality in which U.S. Highway 82 and Old Highway 61 intersect; 28.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 8 meets Mississippi Highway 1; 29.  A municipality in which U.S. Highway 82 and Mississippi Highway 1 intersect; 30.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 50 meets Mississippi Highway 9; 31.  An area bounded on the north by Pearl Street, on the east by West Street, on the south by Court Street and on the west by Farish Street, within a municipality bordered on the east by the Pearl River and through which run Interstate 20 and Interstate 55; 32.  Any facility and related property that: a.  Is contracted for mixed-use development improvements consisting of office and residential space and a restaurant and lounge, partially occupying the renovated space of a four-story commercial building which previously served as a financial institution; and adjacent property to the west consisting of a single-story office building that was originally occupied by the Brotherhood of Carpenters and Joiners of American Local Number 569; and b.  Is situated on a tract of land consisting of approximately one and one-tenth (1.10) acres, and the adjacent property to the west consisting of approximately 0.5 acres, located in a municipality which is the seat of county government, situated south of Interstate 10, traversed by U.S. Highway 90, partially bordered on one (1) side by the Pascagoula River and having its most southern boundary bordered by the Gulf of Mexico, with a population greater than twenty-two thousand (22,000) according to the 2010 federal decennial census; however, the governing authorities of such a municipality may by ordinance: A. Specify the hours of operation of facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale; B. Specify the percentage of revenue that facilities that offer alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages; and C. Designate the areas within the  facilities in which alcoholic beverages may be offered for sale; 33.  Any facility with a maximum capacity of one hundred twenty (120) people that consists of at least three thousand (3,000) square feet being heated and cooled, has a commercial kitchen, has a pavilion that consists of at least nine thousand (9,000) square feet and is located on land more particularly described as follows: All that part of the East Half of the Northwest Quarter of Section 21, Township 7 South, Range 4 East, Union County, Mississippi, that lies South of Mississippi State Highway 348 right-of-way and containing 19.48 acres, more or less. ALSO, The Northeast 38 acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 21, Township 7 South, Range 4 East, Union County, Mississippi. ALSO, The South 81 1/2 acres of the Southwest Quarter of Section 21, Township 7 South, Range 4 East, Union County, Mississippi; 34. A municipality in which U.S. Highway 51 and Mississippi Highway 16 intersect; 35.  A municipality in which Interstate 20 passes over Mississippi Highway 15; 36.  Any municipality that is bordered in its northwestern boundary by the Pearl River, traversed by U.S. Highway 49 and Interstate 20, and is located in a county which has voted against coming out from under the dry law; 37.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 28 and Mississippi Highway 29 North intersect; 38. An area bounded as follows within a municipality through which run Interstate 22 and Mississippi Highway 15:  Beginning at a point at the intersection of Bankhead Street and Tallahatchie Trails; then running to a point at the intersection of Tallahatchie Trails and Interstate 22; then running to a point at the intersection of Interstate 22 and Carter Avenue; then running to a point at the intersection of Carter Avenue and Camp Avenue; then running to a point at the intersection of Camp Avenue and King Street; then running to a point at the intersection of King Street and E. Main Street; then running to a point at the intersection of E. Main Street and Camp Avenue; then running to a point at the intersection of Camp Avenue and Highland Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Highland Street and Adams Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Adams Street and Cleveland Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Cleveland Street and N. Railroad Avenue; then running to a point at the intersection of N. Railroad Avenue and McGill Street; then running to a point at the intersection of McGill Street and Snyder Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Snyder Street and Bankhead Street; then running to a point at the intersection of Bankhead Street and Tallahatchie Trails and the point of the beginning; 39.  A municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 43 and U.S. Highway 80; 40.  The coliseum in a municipality in which U.S. Highway 72 passes over U.S. Highway 45; 41.  A piece of property on the northeast corner of the T-intersection where Builders Square Drive meets Mississippi Highway 471; 42.  The clubhouse and associated golf course, tennis courts and related facilities and swimming pool and related facilities located on Oaks Country Club Road less than one-half (1/2) mile to the east of Mississippi Highway 15; 43.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: The East Half (E 1/2) of the Southwest Quarter (SW 1/4) of Section 15, Township 3 North, Range 2 East; a 4 acre parcel in the Southwest Corner of the Southwest Quarter (SW 1/4) of the Southeast Quarter (SE 1/4), Section 15, Township 3 North, Range 2 East, running 210 feet east and west and 840 feet running north and south; the Northeast Quarter (NE 1/4) of the Northwest Quarter (NW 1/4) of Section 22, Township 3 North, Range 2 East, all in Rankin County, Mississippi; 44.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: Beginning at a point 1915 feet west and 2171 feet north of southeast corner, Section 11, Township 24 North, Range 2 West, Second Judicial District, Tallahatchie County, Mississippi, which point is the southwest corner of J.C. Section Lot mentioned in deed recorded in Book 50, page 34, in the records of the Chancery Clerk's Office at Sumner, in said District of said County; thence South 80° West, 19 feet to the east boundary of United States Highway 49-E, thence East along the east boundary of said Highway 270 feet to point of beginning of Lot to be conveyed; thence southeast along the east boundary of said Highway 204 feet to a concrete post at the intersection of the east boundary of said Highway with the west boundary of gravel road from Sumner to Webb, known as Oil Mill Road, thence Northwest along west boundary of said Oil Mill Road 194 feet to center of driveway running southwest from said Oil Mill Road to U.S. Highway 49-E; thence South 66° West along center of said driveway 128 feet to point of beginning, being situated in Northwest Quarter of Southeast Quarter of Section 11, together with all improvements situated thereon; 45.  Any facility that: a. Consists of at least five thousand six hundred (5,600) square feet being heated and cooled along with a lakeside patio that consists of at least two thousand two hundred (2,200) square feet, regardless of whether such patio is part of the facility and/or located adjacent to or in close proximity to the facility; b. Includes a caterer's kitchen and green room for entertainment preparation; c.  For a fee is used to host events; and d.  Is located adjacent to or in close proximity to an approximately nine-acre lake on property that consists of at least one hundred twenty (120) acres in a county traversed by Mississippi Highway 15 and U.S. Highway 278; 46.  Any municipality with a population in excess of one thousand (1,000) according to the 2010 federal decennial census and which is located in a county that is traversed by U.S. Highways 84 and 98 and has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 47.  The clubhouse and associated nine-hole golf course, tennis courts and related facilities and swimming pool and related facilities located on or near U.S. Highway 82 between Mississippi Highway 15 and Mississippi Highway 9; 48.  The downtown square area bound by East Service Drive, Commerce Street, Second Street and Court Street and adjacent properties in a municipality through which run Interstate 55, U.S. Highway 51 and Mississippi Highway 306; 49.  All parcels zoned for mixed-use development located west of Mississippi Highway 589, more than four hundred (400) feet north of Old Highway 24, east of Parkers Creek and Black Creek, and south of J M Burge Road; 50.  Any facility used by a soccer club and located on Old Highway 11 between one-tenth (0.1) and two-tenths (0.2) of a mile from its intersection with Oak Grove Road, in a county in which U.S. Highway 98 and Mississippi Highway 589 intersect; 51.  Any municipality in which U.S. Highway 49 and Mississippi Highway 469 intersect; 52.  Any facility that is: a.  Owned by a Veterans of Foreign Wars (VFW) organization that is a nonprofit corporation and registered with the Mississippi Secretary of State; b.  Used by such organization for its headquarters and other organization related purposes; and c. Located outside of a municipality in a county that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 53.  The following within a municipality in which U.S. Highway 49 and U.S. 61 Highway intersect and through which flows the Sunflower River: a.  An area bounded as follows:  Starting at the southern point of the intersection of Sunflower Avenue and 1st Street and going south along said avenue on its eastern side to 8th Street, then going east along said street on its northern side to West Tallahatchie Street, then going north along said street on its western side to 4th Street/Martin Luther King Boulevard, then going east along said street/boulevard on its northern side to Desoto Avenue, then going north along said avenue on its western side to 1st Street, then going west along said street on its southern side to the point of beginning along the southern side of Court Street; b.  Lots located at or near the intersection of Madison Avenue, Walnut Street, and Riverside Avenue that are in a commercial zone; and c.  Any facility located on the west side of Sunflower Avenue to the Sunflower River between the southern side of 6th Street and the northern side of 8th Street and which is operated as and/or was operated as a hotel or lodging facility, in consideration of payment, regardless of whether the facility meets the criteria for the definition of the term "hotel" in paragraph (l) of this section; and d.  Any facility located on the west side of Sunflower Avenue to the Sunflower River between the southern side of 3rd Street and the northern side of 4th Street/Martin Luther King Boulevard and which is operated as and/or was operated as a musical venue, in consideration of payment; 54.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 340 meets Mississippi Highway 15; 55.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 540 and Mississippi Highway 149 intersect; 56.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 15 and Mississippi Highway 345/Main Street intersect; 57.  The property and structures thereon at the following locations within a municipality through which run U.S. Highway 45 and Mississippi Highway 145 and in which Mississippi Highway 370 and Mississippi Highway 145 intersect:  104 West Main Street, 106 West Main Street, 108 West Main Street, 110 West Main Street and 112 West Main Street; 58.  Any municipality in which U.S. Highway 11 and Main Street intersect and which is located in a county having two (2) judicial districts; 59.  Any municipality in which Interstate 22 passes over Mississippi Highway 9; 60.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: A certain parcel of land being situated in the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, T3N-R3E, Rankin County, Mississippi, and being more particularly described as follows: Commence at an existing 1/2" iron pin marking the Southwest corner of the aforesaid Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, T3N-R3E and run thence North 00 degrees 06 minutes 13 seconds East along the East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 for a distance of 33.18 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; leaving said East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4, run thence South 89 degrees 53 minutes 47 seconds East for a distance of 2.08 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 22 minutes 19 seconds East for a distance of 561.90 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds East for a distance of 76.42 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin marking the POINT OF BEGINNING of the parcel of land herein described; from said POINT OF BEGINNING, continue thence North 00 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds East along an existing fence for a distance of 493.27 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 03 degrees 08 minutes 15 seconds East for a distance of 170.22 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin on the North line of the aforesaid Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9; run thence North 89 degrees 46 minutes 45 seconds East along said North line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9 for a distance of 1,305.51 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin marking Northeast corner thereof; leaving said North line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, run thence South 00 degrees 08 minutes 35 seconds West along the East line of said Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9 for a distance of 663.19 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; leaving said East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, run thence South 89 degrees 46 minutes 45 seconds West for a distance of 1,315.51 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 20.00 acres, more or less. And Also:  An easement for the purpose of ingress and egress being situated in the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 and in the Northeast 1/4 of the Southeast 1/4 of Section 9, T3N-R3E, Rankin County, Mississippi, and being more particularly described as follows: Begin at an existing 1/2" iron pin marking the Southwest corner of the aforesaid Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 9, T3N-R3E and run thence North 00 degrees 06 minutes 13 seconds East along the East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 for a distance of 33.18 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; leaving said East line of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4, run thence South 89 degrees 53 minutes 47 seconds East for a distance of 2.08 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 22 minutes 19 seconds East for a distance of 561.90 feet to an existing 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds East for a distance of 76.42 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 89 degrees 46 minutes 45 seconds East for a distance of 25.00 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence South 00 degrees 16 minutes 18 seconds West for a distance of 76.66 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence South 00 degrees 22 minutes 19 seconds West for a distance of 619.81 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence South 89 degrees 43 minutes 01 seconds West for a distance of 26.81 feet to a set 1/2" iron pin; run thence North 00 degrees 06 minutes 13 seconds East along the West line of the aforesaid Northeast 1/4 of the Southeast 1/4 of Section 9 for a distance of 25.00 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 17,525.4 square feet, more or less. 61.  Any municipality bordered on the east by the Pascagoula River and on the south by the Mississippi Sound; 62.  The property and structures thereon located at parcel numbers 4969 198 000; 4969 200 000; 4969 201 000; 4969 206 000; 4969 207 000; 4969 208 000; 4969 218 000; 4969 199; 4969 204 000 and 4969 204 001, all in Block 4 of the original town square in any municipality with a population in excess of one thousand five hundred (1,500) according to the latest federal decennial census and which is located in: a.  A county traversed by Interstate 55 and Interstate 20, and b.  A judicial district that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 63.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 12 meets Mississippi Highway 17; 64.  Any municipality in which U.S. Highway 49 and Mississippi Highway 469 intersect; 65.  The clubhouse and associated nine-hole golf course and related facilities located on or near the eastern corner of the point at which Golf Course Road meets Athens Road, in a county in which Mississippi Highway 13 and Mississippi Highway 28 intersect, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.900370078041004, -89.7928067652611; 66.  Any facility located at the south-to-southwest corner of the intersection of Madison Street and Bolton Brownsville Road, in a municipality in which Bolton Brownsville Road passes over Interstate 20, with GPS coordinates of approximately 32.349067271758955, -90.4596221146197; 67.  Any facility located at the northwest corner of the intersection of Depot Street and Madison Street, in a municipality in which Bolton Brownsville Road passes over Interstate 20, with GPS coordinates of approximately 32.34903152971068, -90.46047660172901; 68.  Any facility located on Hinds Boulevard approximately three-tenths (0.3) of a mile south of the point at which Hinds Boulevard diverges from Clinton Road, in a municipality whose northern boundary partially consists of Snake Creek Road, and whose southern boundary partially consists of Mississippi Highway 18, with GPS coordinates of approximately 32.26384517526713, -90.41586570183475; 69.  Any facility located on Pleasant Grove Drive approximately one and three-tenths (1.3) miles southeast of its intersection with Harmony Drive, in a county through which run Interstate 55 and U.S. Highway 84, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.512043770371907, -90.2506094382595; 70.  Any facility located immediately north of the intersection of two roads, both named Mason Clark Drive, located between two-tenths (0.2) and three-tenths (0.3) of a mile southwest of Mississippi Highway 57/63, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.135950529733048, -88.53068674585575; 71.  Any facility located on Raj Road approximately three-tenths (0.3) of a mile south of Mississippi Highway 57/63, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.139553708288418, -88.53411203512971; 72.  Any facility located on Raj Road approximately one-tenth (0.1) of a mile south of Mississippi Highway 57/63, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.14184097577295, -88.53287700849411; 73.  Any municipality through which run U.S. Highway 45 and Mississippi Highway 145 and in which Mississippi Highway 370 and Mississippi Highway 145 intersect; however, this designation as a qualified resort area shall only apply to the portion of such municipality which is located in a county that has not voted to come out from under the dry law; 74.  A municipality through which runs a portion of the Tanglefoot Trail and in which Mississippi Highway 32 and East Front Street intersect; 75.  Lot Three (3) in Block One Hundred Seventy-eight (178) of the D.H. McInnis First Survey, sometimes referred to as D.H. McInnis Railroad Addition, to the City of Hattiesburg, the said lot having a frontage of thirty (30) feet on the Eastern side of Front Street and extending back between parallel lines ninety (90) feet to an alley, and being located in the Northwest Quarter of Section 10, Township 4 North, Range 13 West, Forrest County, Mississippi; 76.  An area of land in George County of approximately eight and five hundredths (8.05) acres, bordered on the east and northeast by Brushy Creek, on the northwest by Brushy Creek Road, on the west by Beaver Creek Road, and on the south by a property boundary running east and west; 77.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 15 intersects with Webster Street, and in which Webster Street splits into Mill Street and Maben Starkville Road; 78.  A municipality in which Mississippi Highway 492 meets Mississippi Highway 35; 79.  A facility operating as an event venue and located on Mississippi Highway 589, with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.36730, -89.50548; 80.  An area situated in the SW 1/4 of Section 12, T7N-R2E, Madison County, Mississippi, and commencing at the point on the Ross Barnett Reservoir directly east of the intersection of North Natchez Street and Louisiana Street, then go west on Louisiana Street to the intersection of Louisiana Street and Andrew Jackson Street, then west on Andrew Jackson Street to the intersection of Andrew Jackson Street and Choctaw Street, then north on Choctaw Street to the intersection of Choctaw Street and Republic Street, then west on Republic Street to the intersection of Republic Street and Port Street, then north on Port Street to the Natchez Trace right-of-way, then east on the Natchez Trace right-of-way to the Ross Barnett Reservoir, then following the Ross Barnett Reservoir south back to the point of beginning; 81.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: Commencing at a fence corner at the Northeast corner of Section 34, Township 6 South, Range 3 East, Union County, Mississippi, for the point of beginning; thence run South 00 degrees 31 minutes 39 seconds East, along the Section line, a distance of 161.83 feet to a one-half inch iron pin, thence North 88 degrees 20 minutes 48 seconds West, along a fence, a distance of 1221.09 feet to a one-half iron pin, thence South 09 degrees 45 minutes 37 seconds West, along a fence, a distance of 61.49 feet to a one-half inch iron pin, thence North 84 degrees l8 minutes 01 seconds West, along a fence, (passing through a one-half inch iron pin at 196.83 feet) a distance of 234.62 feet to a mag-nail on the centerline of Union County Road No. 137, thence North 11 degrees 00 minutes 29 seconds East a distance of 187.87 feet to a one-half inch iron pin on the West edge of said road, thence North 29 degrees 41 minutes 28 seconds East a distance of 59.28 feet to a point on the centerline of said road, thence South 89 degrees 13 minutes 02 seconds East (passing through a one-half inch iron pin at 30.0 feet) along the South line of the Bernard Whiteside property as recorded in Deed Book 117, Pages 517-518 and Deed Book 214, page 109, a distance of 646.07 feet to a concrete monument, thence South 89 degrees 13 minutes 02 seconds East a distance of 751.31 feet to a one-half inch iron pin, thence South 00 degrees 31 minutes 39 seconds East, along the aforesaid Section line, a distance of 52.93 feet to the point of beginning, said tract lying in the Southeast Quarter of Section 27, and the Northeast Quarter of Section 34, Township 6 South, Range 3 East and containing 6.99 acres. Subject to a perpetual all purpose non-exclusive easement for ingress, egress and public utilities together the right to enter upon the above described property and do any and all work necessary to build, repair and maintain a roadway or well or install public utilities all over upon and across the following described property: A 25.0 foot easement for ingress and egress, being 12.5 feet to the right and 12.5 feet to the left of the following described centerline:  Commencing at a fence corner at the Northeast corner of Section 34, Township 6 South, Range 3 East, Union County, Mississippi, thence run South 00 degrees 31 minutes 39 seconds East, along the Section line, a distance of 149.33 feet to the point of beginning; thence North 88 degrees 20 minutes 48 seconds West a distance of 1231.46 feet to a point, thence South 09 degrees 45 minutes 37 seconds West a distance of 61.49 feet to a point, thence North 84 degrees 18 minutes 01 seconds West a distance of 221.82 feet to a point on the centerline of Union County Road #137, said tract lying in the Northeast Quarter of Section 34, Township 6 South, Range 3 East; 82.  A country club located: a.  In a county in which Mississippi Highway 15 and Mississippi Highway 16 intersect and which county has not voted to come out from under the dry law, and b. Outside the corporate limits of any municipality in such county and within one (1) mile of the corporate limits of a municipality that is the county seat of such county; 83.  Any facility located on North Jackson Street in a municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 8 and Mississippi Highway 15, with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.913692, -89.005219; 84.  Any facility located on North Jackson Street in a municipality through which run Mississippi Highway 8 and Mississippi Highway 15, with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.905581, -89.00200; 85.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the Southeast corner of Section 4, Township 6 South, Range 18 West, Pearl River County, Mississippi; thence West 1310.00 feet to a T-bar; thence North 745.84 feet; thence East 132.00 feet to a 1" iron pipe; thence North 83.61 feet for the Point of Beginning; thence South 79 degrees 02 minutes 61 seconds West 248.28 feet; thence West 76.35 feet; thence North 20 degrees 00 minutes 00 seconds West 185.54 feet; thence North 52 degrees 43 minutes 14 seconds East 365.98 feet to a 1" iron pipe on the West margin of Henry Smith Road, a gravel/paved, public road; thence along said margin South 17 degrees 59 minutes 13 seconds East 299.09 feet; thence South 64.39 feet to the Point of Beginning.  This parcel containing 2.19 acres and being a part of the East 1/2 of Section 4, Township 6 South, Range 18 West, Pearl River County, Mississippi. INDEXING:  BEING A PART OF THE EAST 1/2 OF SECTION 4, TOWNSHIP 6 SOUTH, RANGE 18 WEST, PEARL RIVER COUNTY, MISSISSIPPI; 86.  Any facility located on land in a county through which run Mississippi Highway 25 and U.S. Highway 82 and more particularly described as follows:  Beginning at a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.331869, -88.715054; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.336207, -88.713453; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.335369, -88.709835; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.330870, -88.711496; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.331869, -88.715054 and the point of the beginning; 87.  Any facility located on land that is owned by a community college that is located in a county through which run U.S. Highway 51 and Mississippi Highway 4; 88.  Any facility located on Mississippi Highway 23/178 in a municipality in which Mississippi Highway 23/178 and Stone Drive intersect, with GPS coordinates of approximately 34.235269, -88.262409; 89.  Any facility located on U.S. Highway 51 in a municipality through which run Interstate 55, U.S. Highway 51 and the Natchez Trace Parkway, with GPS coordinates of approximately 32.42042°N, 90.13473°W; 90.  Any facility located on Mullican Road in a county through which run U.S. Highway 84 and Interstate 59,  with GPS coordinates of approximately 31.73395N, 89.18186W; 91.  Any facility located on land in a county through which run Mississippi Highway 25 and U.S. Highway 82 and more particularly described as follows:  Beginning at a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.37391, -88.80645; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.37391, -88.79972; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.36672, -88.80644; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.36674, -88.79971; then running in a straight line to a point with GPS coordinates of approximately 33.37391, -88.80645 and the point of the beginning; 92.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: All that part of the South half (S 1/2) of the SE 1/4 of NE 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, lying and being West of State Highway No. 589, containing one (1) acre, more or less. LESS AND EXCEPT: Begin at the point of intersection of the North line of the South 1/2 of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West with the present Southwesterly right-of-way line of Mississippi Highway No. 589, said point is also the Northeast corner of grantor property; said point is 50.6 feet West of Station 7 + 59.27 on the centerline of survey of Mississippi Highway No. 589 as shown on the plans for State Project No. SP-0014-2(10); from said POINT OF BEGINNING run thence South 08°57' East along said present Southwesterly right-of-way line, a distance of 37.1 feet to a point that is perpendicular to and 50 feet Southwesterly of Station 7 + 30 on the centerline of survey of Mississippi Highway 589 as shown on the plans for said project; run thence South 81°03' West, a distance of 35.7 feet to the West line of the South 1/2 of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section 14 and the West line of grantors property; run thence North along said West property line, a distance of 42.2 feet to the Northwest corner of the South 1/2 of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of said Section 14 and the Northwest corner of grantors property; run thence East along grantors North property line, a distance of 29.5 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING containing 0.03 acres, more or less, and all being situated in and a part of the South 1/2 of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi. LESS AND EXCEPT: A part of the South one-half of the Southeast 1/4 of Northeast 1/4, Northerly of a certain fence and West of Mississippi State Highway 589, in Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi and more particularly described as commencing at a pine (lighter) stake being used as the Southwest corner of the Northeast 1/4 of Southeast 1/4 of the above said Section 14, thence North and along the West line of the East 1/4 of the above said Section 14 1638.8 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING.  Thence continue North and along the West line of the East 1/4 of the above said Section 14, 278.5 feet to the Southerly line of the property Bobby G. Aultman and Marilyn S. Aultman previously sold to the Mississippi State Highway Department; thence North 81°03' East and along the above said Southerly property line for 35.7 feet more or less to the Westerly right-of-way line of Mississippi State Highway 589; thence Southeasterly and along the above said Westerly right-of-way line 232.7 feet to a concrete right-of-way marker; thence South 51°39' West and along the Northerly line of a wooden fence 88 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING. AND ALSO: A parcel of land in a part of the Southeast 1/4 of Northwest 1/4 and a part of the Southwest 1/4, Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi, and more particularly described as beginning at a point where the Southerly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway 98 intersects the West line of the above said Southeast 1/4 of Northwest 1/4; thence North 67°34' East and along the Southerly right-of-way line of said highway 208.75 feet; thence South 208.75 feet; thence South 67°34' West 208.75 feet; thence South 141.3 feet; thence North 89°07'30" West 388.9 feet to the centerline of Parkers Creek; thence Northerly and along the centerline of said creek for the next three (3) calls:  North 35°53' East 115.6 feet; North 25°05' East 68.5 feet; North 09°51'30" West 64.3 feet to the Southerly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway 98; thence North 67°34' East and along the Southerly right-of-way line of said highway 327.85 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING.  The above described area contains 3.02 acres. AND ALSO: Commencing at the Southwest corner of the Southwest 1/4 of the Northeast 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi, run South 88°05'27" East 310.00 feet, thence South 0°53'16" West 60.50 feet to a point on a fence line, thence run along fence line South 88°05'27" East 718.93 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, thence North 08°48'10" West 714.67 feet to a point on the South right-of-way line of Highway No. 98, thence along said right-of-way along a curve to the right with a delta angle of 02°04'26" having a radius of 5603.58 feet and an arc length of 202.84 feet, with a chord bearing a distance of North 71°53'47" East 202.83 feet to a Concrete Highway right-of-way marker, thence South 20°09'13" East 328.13 feet, thence South 69°00'47" East 117.68 feet, thence South 0°58'19" West 429.12 feet to a Point on Possession Line fence, thence along said fence North 88°05'27" West 299.23 feet back to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 5.0885 acres, more or less and being situated in the SW 1/4 of the NE 1/4 and the NW 1/4 of the SE l/4 of said Section 14, together with all improvements and appurtenances thereunto belonging. AND ALSO: PARCEL NUMBER ONE:  That part of the Northwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter (Northwest 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4) of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, of Lamar County, Mississippi, being located and situated East of the center thread of Mill Creek as the same presently runs through and bisects said 40-acre tract, and comprising 10.9 acres, more or less, and all being part of the Northwest Quarter of the Southwest Quarter (Northwest 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4) of said Section, Township and Range, Lamar County, Mississippi. AND ALSO: PARCEL NUMBER TWO:  A part of the Southeast Quarter of the Northwest Quarter (Southeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4) and part of the Northeast Quarter of the Southwest (Northeast 1/4 of the Southwest 1/4) all in Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi, being more particularly described as follows, to wit: Beginning at a point where the South margin of State Highway 98 intersects the West margin of the Southeast 1/4 of the Northwest 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, and run Easterly along the South margin of said highway right-of-way 208.75 feet; thence South 208.75 feet; thence Westerly parallel with the South margin of said highway right-of-way 208.75 feet to the West forty line; thence North 208.75 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 1 acre, more or less. LESS AND EXCEPT: Begin at the point of intersection of an Easterly line of grantors property with the present Southerly right-of-way line of U.S. Highway 98 as shown on the plans for State Project No. 97-0014-02-044-10; from said POINT OF BEGINNING run thence South 02°56' West along said Easterly property line, a distance of 127.6 feet; thence run South 69°11' West, a distance of 52.9 feet; thence run South 67°13' West, a distance of 492.7 feet to the Westerly line of grantors property and the center of a creek; thence run Northerly along said Westerly property line and said center of creek, a distance of 122.8 feet to said present Southerly right-of-way line; thence run North 67°13' East along said present Southerly right-of-way line, a distance of 553.4 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING, containing 1.43 acres, more or less, and being situated in and a part of the North 1/2 of the Southwest 1/4 of Section 14, Township 4 North, Range 15 West, Lamar County, Mississippi. LESS AND EXCEPT: COMMENCING AT THE SOUTHWEST CORNER OF SECTION 14, TOWNSHIP 4 NORTH, RANGE 15 WEST, LAMAR COUNTY, MISSISSIPPI, PROCEED EAST 2136.60 FEET; THENCE NORTH 2508.67 FEET TO AN IRON PIN AND THE POINT OF BEGINNING OF THE PARCEL HEREIN DESCRIBED. FROM THE DESCRIBED POINT OF BEGINNING, PROCEED NORTH 11°19'49" EAST 217.55 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 40°11'01" EAST 118.28 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 22°24'39" WEST 179.15 FEET TO AN IRON PIN ON THE SOUTHERN BOUNDARY OF U.S. HIGHWAY 98; THENCE ALONG THE SOUTHERN RIGHT-OF-WAY BOUNDARY OF SAID HIGHWAY AS FOLLOWS:  SOUTH 67°35'21" WEST 699.55 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE SOUTH 69°16'57" WEST 67.67 FEET TO A CONCRETE RIGHT-OF-WAY MARKER; THENCE SOUTH 67°35'21" WEST 310.34 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE LEAVING SAID RIGHT-OF-WAY SOUTH 01°25'53" WEST 667.21 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 67°35'21" EAST 491.91 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 22°24'39" WEST 193.77 FEET TO AN IRON PIN; THENCE NORTH 67°35'21" EAST 629.48 FEET BACK TO THE POINT OF BEGINNING. SAID PARCEL CONTAINS 12.39 ACRES AND IS LOCATED PART IN THE SE 1/4 OF THE NW 1/4, PART IN THE NE 1/4 OF THE SW 1/4, AND PART IN THE NW 1/4 OF THE SW 1/4, ALL IN SECTION 14, TOWNSHIP 4 NORTH, RANGE 15 WEST, LAMAR COUNTY, MISSISSIPPI; 93.  The clubhouse and associated golf course, tennis courts, swimming pools and related facilities located at 333 Fairway Drive, Pontotoc, Mississippi; 94.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: A 4.16 acre parcel being situated in the SE 1/4 of SE 1/4 of Section 31, T3N-R1E, Rankin County, Mississippi, and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the SE corner of said Section 31, run thence WEST - 643.33 feet to a point on the mean high water line of the Pearl River; thence North 10 degrees 50 minutes 51 seconds West - 444.38 feet along said mean high water line; thence North 11 degrees 58 minutes 08 seconds West - 58.90 feet along said mean high water line to the POINT OF BEGINNING:  run thence North 11 degrees 58 minutes 08 seconds West - 326.63 feet along said mean high water line; thence North 19 degrees 52 minutes 24 seconds West - 74.80 feet along said mean high water line; thence North 78 degrees 01 minutes 52 seconds East - 464.81 feet; thence South 07 degrees 25 minutes 10 seconds East - 39.75 feet; thence South 11 degrees 58 minutes 08 seconds East - 361.10 feet; thence South 78 degrees 01 minutes 52 seconds West - 451.31 feet to the POINT OF BEGINNING. TOGETHER WITH a 30 foot wide access easement being situated in the SE 1/4 of Section 31, T3N, R1E, Rankin County, Mississippi; being 15 feet either side of a centerline and being more particularly described as follows: Commencing at the SE corner of said Section, run thence North - 380.22 feet to a point on the northerly right-of-way of Moncure Road; thence North 86 degrees 39 minutes 56 seconds West - 257.25 feet along said road to the POINT OF BEGINNING; run thence North 11 degrees 58 minutes 08 seconds West - 557.86 feet to the POINT OF TERMINUS; 95.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 26 and U.S. Highway 11 intersect and a public community college is located; 96.  Any municipality in which Mississippi Highway 15 meets U.S. Highway 82; 97.  Any facility and/or venue and related property at 305 South Monroe Street, Houston, Mississippi 98.  The following within a municipality in which Mississippi 35 and U.S. Highway 49 intersect: a.  An area bounded on the south by Town Creek; on the north and east by the Canadian National Railroad (formerly Illinois Central Railroad); on the west by Third Street; and on the south and east by Cotton Street; and b.  Any facility located on land more particularly described as follows: Begin at the Northwestern Corner of Lot 2, Section 2, Township 9 North, Range 17 West, and run southeasterly, parallel with U.S. Highway No. 49 to the point of intersection with the south line of the NE 1/4 of SW 1/4 of Section 18, Township 9 North, Range 16 West; thence run East along said south line of the NE 1/4 of SW 1/4 to the point of intersection with the west line of the NE 1/4 of SE 1/4 of said Section 18; thence run parallel with U.S. Highway No. 49 to a point due east of the point of beginning; thence run west back to the point of beginning. The status of these municipalities, districts, clubhouses, facilities, golf courses and areas described in this paragraph (o)(iii) as qualified resort areas does not require any declaration of same by the department. The governing authorities of a municipality or county described, in whole or in part, in item 6, 21, 24, 25, 26, 27, 28, 29, 30, 31, 34, 35, 36, 37, 38, 39, 46, 48, 51, 53, 54, 55, 56, 58, 59, 61, 63, 64, 66, 67, 68, 73, 74, 83, 84, 93, 94, 95, 96, or 97 of this paragraph (o)(iii) may by ordinance, with respect to the qualified resort area described in the same item:  specify the hours of operation of facilities offering alcoholic beverages for sale; specify the percentage of revenue that facilities offering alcoholic beverages for sale must derive from the preparation, cooking and serving of meals and not from the sale of beverages; and designate the areas in which facilities offering alcoholic beverages for sale may be located. (p)  "Native wine" means any product, produced in Mississippi for sale, having an alcohol content not to exceed twenty-one percent (21%) by weight and made in accordance with revenue laws of the United States, which shall be obtained primarily from the alcoholic fermentation of the juice of ripe grapes, fruits, berries, honey or vegetables grown and produced in Mississippi; provided that bulk, concentrated or fortified wines used for blending may be produced without this state and used in producing native wines.  The department shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations to permit a producer to import such bulk and/or fortified wines into this state for use in blending with native wines without payment of any excise tax that would otherwise accrue thereon. (q)  "Native winery" means any place or establishment within the State of Mississippi where native wine is produced, in whole or in part, for sale. (r)  "Bed and breakfast inn" means an establishment within a municipality where in consideration of payment, breakfast and lodging are habitually furnished to travelers and wherein are located not less than eight (8) and not more than nineteen (19) adequately furnished and completely separate sleeping rooms with adequate facilities, that persons usually apply for and receive as overnight accommodations; however, such restriction on the minimum number of sleeping rooms shall not apply to establishments on the National Register of Historic Places.  No place shall qualify as a bed and breakfast inn under this article unless on the date of the initial application for a license under this article more than fifty percent (50%) of the sleeping rooms are located in a structure formerly used as a residence. (s)  "Board" shall refer to the Board of Tax Appeals of the State of Mississippi. (t)  "Spa facility" means an establishment within a municipality or qualified resort area and owned by a hotel where, in consideration of payment, patrons receive from licensed professionals a variety of private personal care treatments such as massages, facials, waxes, exfoliation and hairstyling. (u)  "Art studio or gallery" means an establishment within a municipality or qualified resort area that is in the sole business of allowing patrons to view and/or purchase paintings and other creative artwork. (v)  "Cooking school" means an establishment within a municipality or qualified resort area and owned by a nationally recognized company that offers an established culinary education curriculum and program where, in consideration of payment, patrons are given scheduled professional group instruction on culinary techniques.  For purposes of this paragraph, the definition of cooking school shall not include schools or classes offered by grocery stores, convenience stores or drugstores. (w)  "Campus" means property owned by a public school district, community or junior college, college or university in this state where educational courses are taught, school functions are held, tests and examinations are administered or academic course credits are awarded; however, the term shall not include any "restaurant" or "hotel" that is located on property owned by a community or junior college, college or university in this state, and is operated by a third party who receives all revenue generated from food and alcoholic beverage sales. (x)  "Native spirit" shall mean any beverage, produced in Mississippi for sale, manufactured primarily by the distillation of fermented grain, starch, molasses or sugar produced in Mississippi, including dilutions and mixtures of these beverages.  In order to be classified as "native spirit" under the provisions of this article, at least fifty-one percent (51%) of the finished product by volume shall have been obtained from distillation of fermented grain, starch, molasses or sugar grown and produced in Mississippi. (y)  "Native distillery" shall mean any place or establishment within this state where native spirit is produced in whole or in part for sale. (z)  "Warehouse operator" shall have the meaning ascribed in Section 67-1-201. (aa)  "Craft spirit" shall mean any alcoholic beverage produced, in whole or in part, in Mississippi by a distillery created under the laws of Mississippi at a location within Mississippi. (bb)  "Craft distillery" shall mean any place or establishment within this state where craft spirit is produced in whole or in part. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.